 He added: “We now have four-month-old diabetic mice that never had diabetes.”
 Dr. Ehud Ullman, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and a professor in the clinical and scientific section of the Canadian Diabetes Association, cautions that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical that diabetes can be cured. He points out that the findings have nothing to do with people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy permanent secretary Sara Danius announced on a Swedish radio show that the Nobel Prize in Literature had been awarded to Bob Dylan, but that the Academy had been unable to contact him directly and had given up trying.
 Danyi said, “We are keeping a low profile for now. I called and emailed my best cooperator, and got a very friendly reply. That’s enough for now.”
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said that when the company was first founded, he couldn't hear the doorbell ringing in his garage workshop.
 He said he had made a WiFi doorbell.
 Mr. Seminov said that after he appeared on the show in 2013, sales for his company soared, and the show’s producers declined to invest in the startup.
 At the end of 2017, Seminov appeared on the QVC television sales channel.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competitor ADT Security.
 Although one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality from the Ebola virus, no medication has yet been proven to treat the current outbreak.
 A cocktail of antibodies called ZMapp, which was initially expected to play a role in the field, has been found to be somewhat ineffective in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp was used as a reference, or baseline, against which the other three treatments were compared.
 USA Gymnastics supports the USOC’s letter and accepts the strict requirements of the Olympic family to provide a safe training environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that rather than withdrawing our licenses, we will continue to drive meaningful change within our organization that will better serve the athletes and clubs and their sport.
 An independent investigation supported by USA Gymnastics may help us understand why the widespread sexual abuse by Larry Nassar, which survivors bravely exposed, went undetected for so long. The organization has also said it will make the necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee share a common goal of ensuring the safest possible environment for gymnastics and other sports, so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 In the 1960s, Brezinski first served as an adviser to John F. Kennedy, and later worked for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 presidential election, he provided foreign policy advice to Carter, and then served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981.
 As national security adviser, he helped Mr. Carter handle a number of international affairs, including the signing of the Camp David Accords in 1978; the normalization of US-China relations in the late 1970s; the Iranian Revolution that led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979; and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated for a number of awards.
 Gosling and Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "A Dream Is a Wish Your Heart Makes" and "Starlight Express", were nominated for Best Original Song. MGM received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Later on Sunday, US President Donald Trump issued a statement through his press secretary, announcing that the US military would withdraw from Syria.
 Trump issued a statement after his call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The statement said Turkey would also take over custody of the arrested Islamic State fighters; European countries have refused to repatriate them.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers—a theory that has been widely accepted—but also provides details that fossils usually cannot provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say the animal had a reddish-brown top and a pale or purplish bottom.
 This discovery also helps to understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 The dinosaurs' feathers did not develop a main shaft, called a "pneumatic" or "pneumatophore," but still had other features of feathers, such as barbs and barbules, suggesting that the evolution of the shaft may have lagged behind the evolution of these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or display. The researchers believe that, although this is a juvenile dinosaur, the sample shows mature plumage, rather than juvenile feathers.
 The researchers believe that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows adult feathers, not juvenile down.
 On Wednesday morning, a car bomb exploded in the Turkish city of Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspected an Islamic State (ISIL) militant was behind the attack.
 They found that the sun and other stars work in the same way: the activity of all the stars in a galaxy is completely determined by their luminosity and their rotation.
 The Rossby number of a star is determined by its luminosity and rotation rate, and is related to the stellar wind.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in magnetic reversals.
 On the road, Iwaki encountered trouble on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, kidnapped in Nepal, and arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can run at both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 It can backward-compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has dual radio.
 802.11n is much faster than previous technologies, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval is married with two grown children, and he didn't leave much of an impression on the story's narrator, Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, "Mike said a lot of things at the hearing... I was preparing, so I didn't really hear what he was saying."
 “By 2020, we will strive to achieve a significant reduction in the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP compared with 2005,” Hu said.
 He did not set a reduction figure, but said it would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu Jintao encouraged developing countries “not to retrace the old path of pollution first and then clean up”.
 He added, “However, they should not be asked to shoulder obligations that are beyond their stage of development, their responsibilities and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Survey Group submitted its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 The report warns that no one can guarantee that any action currently being taken in Iraq will stop the sectarian war, the growing violence or the slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for the United States to have an open debate and a consensus on its Middle East policy.
 The report was highly critical of almost every aspect of the Administration’s current policy on Iraq and urged an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations in the report is for new diplomatic action by the end of the year to protect Iraq’s borders from hostile forces and to rebuild diplomatic relations with neighboring countries.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current senator and Argentina's first lady, announced her candidacy for the presidency last night in La Plata, 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Teatro Colón in 2005, and began her campaign for the Senate as a representative of Buenos Aires Province.
 The debate began over the controversial spending on relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina; some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to it as “Bush’s new (New Orleans) policy.”
 Criticism of the reconstruction effort from the liberal side has focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to what was seen as a Washington insider.
 Over 4 million people went to Rome for the funeral.
 The funeral on St. Peter's Square was so crowded that it was impossible for everyone to get in.
 Large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar facilities are set up in many other Italian cities and elsewhere in the world, especially in Poland.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies, which concentrated resources on easy-to-solve cases, such as car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress funded the initiative starting in fiscal year 2005, and mandated the FBI to assign 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the match, bowling 11 fours and 2 sixes, and scoring 70 runs off just 41 balls.
 Middle order batsman Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well, putting up a 100-run partnership.
 But after the captain lost the three pillars, India scored only 36 points in the game to end the game, losing 7 pillars.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Goh Chok Tong and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush told the audience about the prospects of Asian trade expansion.
 On Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper, after a 25-minute meeting in his office with NDP Leader Jack Layton, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review before second reading.
 “Layton, during his meeting with the prime minister, demanded changes to the Conservative Party’s environmental bill, asking for a ‘complete rewrite’ of the Conservative Party’s environmental bill.”
 Since the federal government took over the funding of the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some federal MPs have criticised the move as a political stunt ahead of the federal election in November.
 But Australian Prime Minister John Howard said the bill was only to prevent the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government by allocating an extra $45 million.
 The latest report shows that sea level readings indicate that tsunamis have occurred. Tsunami activity has been recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 Tonga reported no major damage or casualties, but electricity was temporarily disrupted. The power outage reportedly prevented Tongan authorities from receiving a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center (PTWC).
 Although the alert was lifted, 14 schools located on or near the Hawaiian coastline were closed for the entire day.
 U.S. President George W. Bush expressed support for the announcement.
 "The Bush administration spokesman Gordon Johndroe said the North's commitment was "an important step toward verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Subtropical Storm Jerry formed in the Atlantic today, the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said that the storm was no longer a threat to land.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the dam to fail.
 When Hurricane Katrina hit, the water in the Ninth Ward reached 20 feet, and now it's up to the knees.
 At one point, the river was about to overflow its banks.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion of the content in an interview with Wikinews last month.
 “To be honest, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning. First, he pretended to listen to us, and then he deleted the artwork.”
 Due to public outrage, a policy is being drafted to address the site's sexual content, which has millions of media outlets with public distribution licenses.
 Most of the work was theoretical, but the programs were written to simulate observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The team is looking for an effect that could be caused by the tidal force between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the galaxy cluster.
 Just as the moon pulls on Earth to create tides, the Milky Way pulls on the Sagittarius dwarf galaxy.
 Scientists can conclude that the way in which dark matter affects other dark matter is the same as ordinary matter.
 The theory suggests that most of the dark matter around a galaxy is in some sort of halo around the galaxy, made up of many small particles.
 Television reports showed smoke pouring from the factory.
 The local government warned residents near the nuclear plant to stay indoors, turn off their air conditioning and not to drink tap water.
 The Japan Atomic Energy Agency said that the plant detected radioactive cesium and iodine.
 The agency speculated that the containers storing the uranium fuel may have ruptured and were leaking.
 Dr. Tony Muller discovered this widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa.
 In an interview, he said that this new variant "is very disturbing and worrying because it has a very high mortality rate."
 Dr. Moll believes that some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of the patients were hospital staff.
 In a year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Yet the prevalence of drug-resistant TB among the entire TB population appears to be low; in South Africa, for example, only 6,000 of the 330,000 people infected at any given time are infected with drug-resistant TB.
 Both satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds, were traveling at 17,500 miles per hour when they collided at an altitude of 491 miles above Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion was huge.
 They are still working to determine the size of the impact and its effects on Earth.
 The US Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the graphic analysis will be published on the public network.
 Ohio authorities said that a doctor who works at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will face a charge of aggravated murder after a medical examiner found the woman's body in the doctor's car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in the suburb of Brunswick, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, Ohio, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, lying on the side of the road, and appeared to have taken a large amount of drugs.
 She instructed the officers to look in her black Osmobiel, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramaniam, covered in bloodstains and a blood-soaked blanket.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The virus is carried by pigs, which then infect humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak prompted the Indian government to take some measures, such as placing traps in heavily infected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying insecticides.
 The government has also pledged to provide millions of doses of the meningitis vaccine, which will help health facilities prepare for next year.
 Lack of funding and low priority compared to other diseases have delayed plans to provide vaccines to the worst-hit areas this year.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden. Three years later he began working for the Swedish Post Office as chief stamp engraver.
 He has produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries/regions.
 His work is highly recognizable, with a high quality and rich detail, which has made him one of the few "household names" among collectors. Some people collect his work.
 “His 1000th stamp, issued in 2000, was based on a painting by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, The Great Feat of the Swedish King, and was thus included in the Guinness Book of World Records.”
 He has also been involved in the design of many national currencies, most recently the Prime Minister's portrait on the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to hospital, but died soon after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 At around 12:00 GMT (Greenwich Mean Time) that day, the vehicle was towed away from the accident site.
 A worker standing in a garage near the scene of the accident said: "The children were waiting to cross the road and were crying and screaming loudly."
 They all ran back from where the accident happened.
 Other issues on the agenda at Bali include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less polluting ways.
 The United Nations also hopes to eventually establish a fund to help affected countries cope with the effects of global warming.
 The funds could be used to build flood-resistant houses, improve water management and promote crop diversification.
 Furlough wrote that some people tried to suppress women's voices on women's health issues, but that it was not to be.
 She came to this conclusion because she received many positive and encouraging messages from individuals, both men and women, who advocated for contraceptives as a medical necessity.
 The injured were taken to the hospital, the fighting subsided, and the remaining 40 or so prisoners were left in the yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to turn the situation around, but the prisoners' demands were unclear.
 In the summer, in the mountainous regions, between 10 p.m. and 11 p.m., the prisoners in the yard set fire to the prison.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and forced the prisoners to flee.
 Firefighters eventually extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal flooding was controlled and sediment no longer washed into the river.
 This sediment is a necessary condition for the formation of sandbars and beaches, which are habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species became extinct, and four more became endangered, including the Atlantic salmon.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet after the flood, officials hope it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning in place at this time. According to the Jakarta Geological Agency, there is no tsunami warning because the quake did not reach a magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there is no threat of a tsunami, residents are feeling uneasy and are leaving their homes and businesses.
 Although Winfrey was tearful at the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would be back.
 “This is not a farewell. This is the end of a chapter, and the beginning of a new one.”
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections show that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba has been re-elected with a huge margin.
 The ruling SWAPO party also retained its majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan forces entered the area to secure the position, while other coalition aircraft were sent to provide support.
 The crash occurred in a high mountainous area, and was reportedly caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site was hampered by bad weather and difficult terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country’s history.
 MSF spokesman Richard Veerman said: "Angola is facing the worst epidemic in its history and the situation on the ground is still very bad."
 The match started at 10 a.m. The weather was good, with a light drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared up. The weather was perfect for seven-a-side rugby.
 The tournament's top seed South Africa got off to a good start, beating number five seed Zambia 26-00.
 In the match against the Southern District sister team, the South African team looked a bit sloppy at first, but as the match progressed, the South African team's performance improved steadily.
 They stand out for their strict defending, ball control and excellent teamwork. Clearly, this is a team that is unbeatable.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum said the tree was infected with a fungus and posed a threat to public health because it was said to be in danger of falling.
 It was due to be felled on Tuesday, but an emergency court ruling saved it.
 All the entrances to the caves (these caves are called the “Seven Sisters”) are at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the temperature changes between day and night suggest that these areas are likely to be caves.
 “Compared to the surface around them，they are cooler during the day and warmer at night.
 "Their heat behavior is not as steady as the large caves on Earth, which tend to be fairly constant in temperature, but they are similar to deep underground caverns," said Glen Cushing of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: Voters go into a small booth, put a pre-printed paper slip into an envelope, and drop it into a box.
 After officials verify the voter's identity, the voter places the envelope in a ballot box and signs the voting register.
 French electoral law sets out a very strict procedure for the election.
 Since 1988, the ballot box must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes in the box when voting begins, and that no one other than the eligible voters has put envelopes in the box.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe every step of the election process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision.
 The Asus Eee PC, which was released earlier than the global version, became the most talked about topic in IT news in Taipei in 2007 due to its cost-saving and functional features.
 But after ASUS won the 2007 Taiwan Sustainable Development Award from the Executive Yuan of Taiwan, the notebook computer market will undergo a fundamental change.
 According to the radio station’s website, the show is a “brand new, thrilling, geeky style old-time radio drama!”
 In its early years, the show was only broadcast on the long-running Internet radio station TogiNet Radio, a site dedicated to talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Broadcast as a sub-radio station.
 The show initially featured amateur voice actors, ranging from local people to East Texans.
 Reportedly, the mass robbery on the streets of Bishkek continued for a night because law enforcement officers were not present.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a “lawless” state, with crowds roaming the streets and looting consumer goods from shops.
 Several Bishkek residents blamed the illegal state of affairs on protesters from the south.
 In the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match at the Royal Bafokeng Sports Palace in Rustenburg, South Africa beat the All Blacks (New Zealand).
 The final result was a one-point victory, 21-20, ending the all-black team's 15-game winning streak.
 The Jumpers finished with five straight losses.
 The Blacks had already won the cup two weeks earlier, and this was their last match.
 The final match of the series will be held next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A strong earthquake struck western Montana late Monday night.
 The US Geological Survey (USGS) and the US National Earthquake Information Center have not yet received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 On Monday, a dead wild duck was found in a marsh near Lyon, eastern France, and tests confirmed that it was infected with the H5N1 strain of bird flu, which is fatal to humans.
 After Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, France is the seventh EU country to be hit hard by the virus.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Cobb had sued God for the "death, destruction and terror" that he said was "everywhere on Earth for billions of inhabitants."
 Cobb was an agnostic, and he considered his prosecution to be "arbitrary", "anyone could be prosecuted for anything".
 Camille Saint-Saens' French opera tells the story of an artist "who was addicted to drugs and obsessed with Japan."
 The result was that the actors smoked marijuana on stage, and the theater itself encouraged the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann ultimately finished fourth, fifth and sixth, respectively.
 After the results came in, King praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, who ran ads against King in Iowa on behalf of Santorum.
 Perry said he would "go back to Texas and assess the results of tonight's caucus and see if there's any viability to this race." He later said he would continue to campaign and participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachelem, who had won a simulation of the election in Emos in August, decided to withdraw from the race.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center in Los Angeles, where he died.
 The statement read: "Although I was not there and did not directly experience the tragic accident, I am saddened by the loss of life and pray for the families of the deceased."
 TMZ learned that the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard, began shooting the police stop, and after crossing the street continued to take pictures, prompting the California Highway Patrol officers conducting the traffic stop to stop their work twice and order him to return to the other side.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will not face criminal charges.
 Because only eighteen medals were awarded each day, many athletes from many countries failed to reach the podium.
 Other medal-less athletes included Anna Cheremeshkina of the Netherlands, who finished ninth in the women's super-combined yesterday, and Kata Saarinen of Finland, who finished 10th in the same event.
 Australian Michelle Goolagong Cranking finished 11th in the women's standing super twist. Czech Odrich Jelinkova finished 16th in the women's sitting super twist.
 Mexican gymnast Laila Flores finished 15th in the women's floor exercise. New Zealand's Adam Hall finished 9th in the men's floor exercise.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the super-G race, while South Korean skier Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's sitting super-G.
 UN peacekeepers were blamed for the outbreak after the 2010 earthquake, as the disease spread from a base near the epicenter.
 The lawsuit alleges that the United Nations camp failed to properly dispose of its waste, causing bacteria to enter the tributaries of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti’s largest rivers.
 Haiti had never had a problem with the disease since the early 19th century, before the arrival of the military.
 An independent study cited by the Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy (IHEDN) suggests that the disease was brought to Haiti by UN peacekeepers from Nepal, who were unaware of the disease.
 UN experts studying the disease, Danielle Lantagne, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient at Howard University Hospital was stable.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where there had been several cases of the Ebola virus.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before appearing on The Simpsons, Simmons had held several different jobs in several different shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he co-created The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and hired the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Subsequent reports said the plane was threatened by a bomb and forced to return to Afghanistan and land in Kandahar.
 Earlier reports said the plane had returned to Afghanistan after being denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where civilian and military aircraft are old and poorly maintained.
 Under international sanctions, Iran cannot buy new planes.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an Iranian plane crashed in Armenia, killing all 168 people on board, the country's worst air disaster in years.
 That same month, another plane crashed off the runway in Mashhad, crashing into a wall and killing 17 people.
 Airbourne have cancelled the remaining dates of their tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 Singer Stephen Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, and the band canceled the rest of the tour.
 Both players held serve in their respective service games, and then Murray lost the first set in the tie-break.
 Del Potro took the early lead in the second set, but the score reached 6-6 and a tie-break was needed.
 At this point, Porter received treatment on his shoulder, but still insisted on continuing the game.
 The show began at 8:30 p.m. local time (15.00 UTC).
 Singers from all over the country sing prayers to Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with a performance by singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Chhappan bhog prayers were also sung. Singer Raju Khandelwal performed with him.
 Then, Rakesh Singh led the group in singing the bhajan.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (Chhappan Bhog is a Hindu term for the 56 different food items that are offered to God, including sweets, fruits, nuts, vegetables, etc.) were offered to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also introduced chhappan bhog bhajan. Singer Raju Khandelwal accompanied him.
 At the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata gave a keynote address and unveiled the design of the company's new Nintendo Revolution game console controller.
 The controller is similar to a television remote control, using two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 It allows players to control the movement and operation of the game in the air by moving the device.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car early on and retired.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was in the lead for most of the race, but he retired after a pit stop, probably because his right front wheel was too badly damaged.
 Michael Schumacher retired shortly after Alonso's retirement, as the suspension of his car was damaged during the race.
 According to the transcript of the news conference, he said: “She’s very cute and she sings very well.”
 “Every time we rehearse this performance, I am moved, really moved.
 About three minutes after launch, the camera on the rocket showed a large amount of insulation foam debris falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, these bubbles were not believed to have caused any damage to the space shuttle.
 NASA Space Shuttle Program Manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam fell off "after the length of time we were concerned about."
 Five minutes into the performance, the wind picked up, and after about a minute, it was blowing at 70 km/h… Then it started to rain, and the rain was so heavy that it stung like needles on the skin. Then hail started to fall from the sky, and the terrified crowd scattered and ran away.
 “My sister and her friend disappeared, and there were two disabled people in wheelchairs on the road, and someone jumped over to help them,” Alm van der Zee said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 TEPCO reported that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant were shut down before the earthquake, and that the quake had no impact on the reactors.
 About 9,400 households in the area were reported to have been affected by the disruption, with about 100 homes losing power.
 Some roads were damaged, and rail service was disrupted in the affected areas. Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport remained closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Within two hours, three more bombs exploded near government buildings.
 Some reports say that the official death toll was 8, while the official report confirmed that up to 30 people were injured; however, the final number has not been determined.
 Urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food contained cyanuric acid and melamine.
 The researchers said the crystals formed by the interaction of the two compounds could cause kidney damage.
 Researchers observed that when they added melamine and urea, the cat's urine formed crystals.
 A comparison by infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) found that the crystals were consistent with those found in the urine of affected pets.
 I don’t know if you are aware of it, but most of the goods that come into this country from Central America are duty-free.
 However, 80 percent of our goods are subject to tariffs in Central American countries. … We treat you.
 I think that is unreasonable; it is clearly unfair.
 I told them: how we treat you, you treat us.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a "18" rating, and retailers who violate the law by selling to minors will be fined $1,000 for each violation.
 The attorney general and the Crown Prosecution Service said they had decided to prosecute Hoon and Prescott.
 Hoon has resigned and his Cabinet post will be taken by MP Ed Davey, while Norman Lamb is expected to take over as business secretary.
 Hoon and Price are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were 25-year-old Nicholas Alden and 21-year-old Zachary Cuddeback, who was driving the car.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and neck, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon failed when it was pointed at the fifth man. Schneider was in agony, one eye blind, a piece of his skull missing, and his face reconstructed with titanium plates.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home in the United States Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to the competition on Wednesday, Carpanedo also participated in two individual competitions in the championship.
 Her first event was the slalom, and she finished the race with an "unfinished" score. The race had 36 competitors out of 116, and she was one of them.
 Her other event was the all-around, where she placed tenth with a total score of 4:41.30, behind the first-place Austrian Claudia Rosch by 2:11.60 and the ninth-place Hungarian Krisztina Dany by 1:09.02.
 Four of the women's sitting skiers failed to finish, and 45 of the 117 Giant Slalom skiers failed to make the cut.
 The Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI) recovered the stolen laptops and mobile phones.
 Deputy Inspector General D K Arya said: “We have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop.”
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Police Commissioner Chandrakant Sharma said the accused were all masked when they appeared in court.
 Although the car hit the house when it was occupied by three people, no one was injured.
 However, the driver's head was badly injured.
 The road was temporarily closed after the accident, and emergency workers pulled the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth for treatment.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adcock was subsequently charged with the murder of her son and appeared at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She was detained, awaiting prosecution and trial; but any evidence from any witnesses could be tainted because her image had been widely disseminated.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but the Scottish legal system is different, and the court felt that publishing the pictures could cause potential harm.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: “There does seem to be a danger if journalists publish information such as photographs of suspects.
 The Crown Prosecution Service, the main prosecuting authority, told reporters that it would not make any further comment until at least after the indictment.
 The document is expected to refer to the border dispute, with Palestine hoping to base its borders on the pre-1967 war lines.
 Other topics reportedly discussed included the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demanded that the agreement include a 10-year deployment of military forces in the central valley, while the Palestinian National Authority agreed to a five-year deployment.
 Rangers closely monitor the shooters in the supplemental trials because the trials are monitored and their effectiveness is assessed.
 In partnership with the NPWS and the NSW Association of Shooting Sports, the Association recruited qualified volunteers for the hunting program.
 National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS) Protection and Heritage Management Director Mick O’Flynn said: “The four shooters selected to participate in the first shooting operation have all received comprehensive safety and training guidance.
 Yesterday, Martelly was sworn in as president of the nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 This is the fifth time that Martelly has been selected by the Haitian Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP president, part of a push to move the country toward new electoral measures.
 The commission was a response to the large-scale anti-government protests that began in October.
 Since 2011, these protests have been sparked by a number of elections that failed to take place on time, and sometimes escalated into violent incidents.
 About 60 iPods reportedly failed, overheated, and caused six fires, resulting in four minor burns.
 Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been notified of 27 incidents involving the device.
 Last week, Japan’s Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported 34 more overheating incidents to the ministry, though the company said the incidents were “not serious.”
 The Economy, Industry and Labor Ministry responded that Apple's delay in releasing the report was "very regrettable."
 The Mariana Islands were hit by an earthquake at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Mariana Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Management said there were no reports of damage.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said it had not detected any tsunami activity.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tourist bus in the capital, Manila, and took the Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza pointed his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, but at least six hostages were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 The two photographers then took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the bathroom, and Mendoza was killed.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career as a doctor.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and worked at the Auckland National Women's Hospital from 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began to study premature birth in her spare time.
 His research has shown that the application of hormones can accelerate the maturation of the baby's lungs.
 The government investigators found two black boxes on Wednesday, the report said.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Mottola said, "Lorna was the first Queen, my first manager. Lorna passed away on the night of the full moon. That night was as special as she was. She was a strong woman."
 Dustin Runnels, aka “Goldust,” said, “Luna and I are both kind of mysterious… She might be even more mysterious… I love her, I miss her… I hope she’s in a better place.”
 A survey of 1,400 people before the 2010 federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had grown by 8% since 2008.
 The then-prime minister Julia Gillard, campaigning for the 2010 federal election, said she believed Australia should become a republic after Queen Elizabeth II's death.
 34% of respondents agreed that Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 The vote was polarized, with 29% of respondents saying Australia should become a republic as soon as possible and 31% saying it should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and Commonwealth Games relay events, but his complaints have cast doubt over his fitness.
 He was unable to take painkillers because of the ban on drugs in the competition.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at Central Missouri University, discovered the largest known prime number to date on January 25.
 In early February, several people validated the discovery using different hardware and software, and announced it on Tuesday.
 Comets may be the source of water and organic matter on Earth, which can form proteins and sustain life.
 Scientists want to know how planets form, especially Earth, since the last time a comet hit the Earth was a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been governor since early this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors “political mischief and stupidity.”
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 The FAA says NextGen will allow planes to fly more direct routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 It uses satellite technology, rather than the older ground radar technology, which enables air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 There are no additional transport options, and the surface train does not stop at Wembley, nor is there any parking or interchange facilities.
 Fearing a lack of transport, the competition could be forced to take place without the support of the teams.
 On Thursday, a study published in the journal Science said a new bird species has formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from the University of Princeton and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that due to the reproduction between the local Darwin's finches and the exotic cactus finch, this new species has only evolved for two generations, although it is believed that this process would take longer.
 Gold can be shaped into various forms. It can be curled into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into thin threads, used for twisting and knotting, or beaten or rolled into flat sheets.
 It can be made very thin, sticking to other metals, and because it is so thin, it can sometimes be used to decorate the hand-painted pictures in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. You can use red cabbage juice to make an indicator.
 The color of the beet juice will change depending on the acidity of the chemical.
 pH is a measure of the amount of hydrogen ions (H) in a chemical.
 The hydrogen ion is an electron-deficient proton (since the hydrogen atom consists of a proton and an electron).
 Stir the two powders together, then use clean, wet hands to form a ball.
 The water on your hands will react with the outside, creating a sort of shell around you that feels really cool.
 Almost every house in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a flush toilet, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Remains of sewage systems have been found in houses on the Greek island of Crete and in the city of St. Torigni Minos.
 Toilets were also found in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman Empire, toilets were often part of public baths, which were mixed-gender facilities.
 You use satellites when you call someone who is far away.
 The satellite in space receives the call and almost immediately reflects it back.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some light and vision.
 To get a satellite or a telescope into space, a giant rocket more than 100 feet high is needed.
 The wheel changed the world in an unimaginable way. The greatest contribution of the wheel to us is to make our transportation more convenient.
 Without it, we would not have trains, cars, and many other forms of transportation.
 Below them are more medium-sized carnivores, which eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelope.
 Eventually, many small carnivores (including domesticated cats) preyed on a much larger variety of small prey, including insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their secret to success is the concept of the litter, where each cat is responsible for a specific task, preventing them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of the cat family, living in large groups called prides.
 A pride consists of one to three adult males that are related, and up to thirty females and cubs.
 As sisters and daughters in the family, females are usually close to each other.
 The behavior of a lion pride is very similar to that of a wolf or dog pack. These animals are remarkably similar in their behavior to lions (but unlike other large felids), and this behavior is also very deadly to their prey.
 Tigers are all-round athletes, they can climb (although not very well), swim, jump and pull a weight five times that of a human strongman.
 Tigers, lions, leopards, and jaguars belong to the same family (the cat family). These four big cats are the only cats that roar.
 The roar of a tiger is not as deep as that of a lion, but more like a growl of anger.
 Cheetahs like to eat small animals. If conditions allow, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. The prey of cheetahs is almost always much smaller than themselves.
 Scientists believe that the jaguar uses smell and traces of prey on the ground to track and hunt.
 They have excellent night vision, and are able to see in the dark. They are also very stealthy in their movements. The leopard's hunting method is to blend in with the environment, and then to pounce on its prey.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) is separated from its original main population (either by crossing a mountain range or river, or by reaching a new island where it cannot easily return) they often find themselves in a different environment.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new populations will need different characteristics or adaptations to be a strong competitor, rather than what they needed before.
 The original populations have not changed at all, and they still need to adapt to the environment as before.
 Over time, new populations adapted to their new environments, and they began to diverge from other populations.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they cannot be considered the same species.
 We call this process “speciation,” or the formation of new species. Speciation is a necessary outcome of evolution, and it is a very important part of it.
 Plants can make oxygen that humans can breathe, and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants obtain nutrients from sunlight through photosynthesis. They also provide shade.
 We make houses out of plants. We make clothes out of plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals cannot survive.
 The Glyptodon was the top predator of its time, and it feared nothing.
 Its lower jaw is lined with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, and its upper jaw has a row of teeth as well. This means that anything that comes in contact with it has no chance of escape.
 Its tongue may be forked, but this is not certain. Its diet includes sea turtles, large fish, other plesiosaurs, and even humans.
 It would attack anything that entered the water, even a huge dinosaur like the Tyrannosaurus.
 Although most of the foods the Romans ate are familiar to us, they did have some strange or unusual feasting foods, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the dormouse.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sit on chairs to eat, while the rich like to gather together for a banquet, lying down to eat.
 Foods that were introduced to Europe from the Americas or Asia centuries later could not have been part of the Roman diet.
 For example, they had no corn, carrots, potatoes, and cocoa, and no Roman ever ate chicken.
 The Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which they considered to be the god's home.
 People would offer sacrifices to the gods, and priests would satisfy the gods' needs through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, and an inner sanctuary that was only accessible to priests.
 Some special towers are pyramidal in shape, called pyramidal ziggurats, and were built as part of a temple complex.
 The top of the tower is a special place of God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, a house is not so important.
 The lives of the Hebrew family were mostly spent outdoors.
 Women cooked in the yard; the shops were open counters in the street. They built their houses of stone.
 Canaan had no large forests, so wood was very expensive.
 The Greenlanders were few in number. According to the Old Norse saga Saga of Erik the Red, who was banished from Iceland for murder, sailed west and discovered land, which he named Greenland.
 But whether or not he found them, the Eskimos were already living there.
 Although they are all part of the Scandinavian region, Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland have many differences in their people, kings, customs and history.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think the Declaration of Independence backside would have a treasure map on it.
 However, the fact is that although the back of the document contains some writing, it is not a map.
 The back of the Declaration of Independence reads "Original Declaration of Independence dated 4th July 1776." The words are written upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one knows who the author was, this large parchment document (29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was apparently rolled up when it was written.
 So it is likely that this symbol was added as a label.
 The Normandy landings and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the south remained unliberated.
 It was ruled by the Vichy French, who in 1940 made a peace agreement with the Germans, not to resist the invaders but to cooperate with them.
 On 15 August 1940, the Allies invaded southern France in an operation called "Operation Dragon".
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces liberated southern France and turned toward Germany.
 Civilization is a single culture shared by a group of people (society) who live together and work together.
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin "civilis" (meaning "of the citizen") and "civis" (meaning "citizen") and "civitas" (meaning "city" or "state"), which in some way defines the scale of society.
 The city-state was the ancestor of the nation. Civilized culture means the transmission of knowledge from generation to generation, the footprints of culture remain, and culture can be spread fairly.
 Minority cultures often disappear without a trace, and are not considered to be civilized.
 During the War of Independence, the thirteen states initially formed a weak central government (Congress was its only component) under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress has no power to tax, and since there is no national executive or judiciary, it can only enforce all laws through the state governments, which often do not cooperate.
 It also has no power to overturn state-to-state tax and tariff laws.
 These amendments require the unanimous consent of all states, and the states are notoriously slow to act on the central government, so that their state representatives often fail to show up.
 The Italian national football team and the German national football team are both the second most successful teams in the world, having won the World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, inline hockey, and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the north, where Italians have competed in international competitions and the Olympic Games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the world's seventh largest island country!
 Because Japan is an island nation, it is often referred to as an "island country" from a geological perspective.
 Western knowledge of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors passing by named the island “Formosa,” meaning beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, and began to change the indigenous people's food production methods, and hired Chinese workers to work in their rice and sugar cane plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan, and in 1885, the Qing Empire proclaimed the establishment of a province in Taiwan.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, ceding sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled Taiwan until 1945.
 The ancient city of Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures: the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 In order to allow visitors to better understand the original appearance of the complex, most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been reconstructed.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image photographic format in the world is 35mm format, which was the dominant film size at the end of the film era.
 It is still in production today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio is used in digital camera image sensors.
 The actual size of the 35 mm format is 36 mm wide and 24 mm high, which is a bit confusing.
 Therefore, the aspect ratio of this format (divided by 12 to get the simplest integer ratio) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (such as the APS format series) are the same or very close to this aspect ratio.
 Often abused and ridiculed, the rule of thirds is a simple guide when creating dynamic images, and it can help keep your images well-ordered.
 It states that the most effective position for the subject is at the intersection of the lines that divide the image vertically and horizontally into thirds (see example).
 During this period in European history, the already wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was closely monitored.
 Although the languages and customs of the European countries are different, for more than a thousand years, Christianity has united them.
 From the king to the common man, it permeates the land and influences everyone.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the Church’s Money Fund is set up for this very purpose.
 The centralized power of the church in Rome had existed for over a thousand years, and the concentration of power and wealth had led many to question whether they were following the tenets of their faith.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began to impose a naval blockade on Germany.
 They cut off vital military and civilian supplies. The strategy proved effective, even though the blockade violated international law, which had been widely accepted for the previous two centuries, under several international agreements.
 Britain was laying mines in international waters to prevent any ships from entering the entire area, even neutral ships.
 Because the response to this strategy has been limited, Germany expects a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing attitude of most citizens was pacifist and separatist.
 After witnessing the atrocities of the First World War, countries wanted to avoid a repeat.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States, accepting a job with the Edison Electric Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former employer, to Thomas Edison.
 Each period of ancient China had its own characteristics; each period of China or each family that ruled the country was a distinct dynasty.
 Likewise, the period of small states and instability during the changes of dynasties was a period of 60 years, during which the Three Kingdoms period was in the midst of the changes between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these turbulent times, various warlords fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for control of the luxurious palaces of the capital, Xi'an.
 There are also many social and political influences, such as the use of units of measurement, the shift from autocracy to republic, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people rather than to a single ruler.
 In addition, after the revolution, the post was open to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and successful to rise to the top.
 The same is true of the military, because the rank of an officer is no longer based on seniority, but on merit.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was interested in things beyond this world. He used to go to a cave called "Hira" on Mount "Nour" (Light) to meditate.
 The cave itself not only survived the test of time, but also provided a vivid image of Muhammad's spiritual aspirations.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain in northern Mecca, completely isolated from the outside world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it is not easy to find. Once you enter the cave, you are completely cut off from the world.
 Apart from the clear blue sky and the surrounding mountains, nothing else can be seen. Inside the cave, almost nothing can be seen or heard from the outside.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World still standing.
 The Great Pyramid is an Egyptian masterpiece from the third millennium BC, one of a series of large pyramids built to honour the deceased pharaohs.
 The Giza plateau in the Egyptian Nile Valley, which includes the Great Pyramid, several smaller pyramids, several small tombs, temples, and the Sphinx, is a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
 The Great Pyramid was built to commemorate Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to commemorate Khufu's wife and family members.
 The “up bow” symbol looks like the letter V, and the “down bow” symbol looks like a nail or a square with a missing bottom.
 Upward bowing means starting from the top of the bow, and downward bowing means starting from the bottom of the bow (where the bow is held).
 The bow is usually played with a softer sound, while the pizzicato is played with a stronger, more determined sound.
 Please make your own markings with a pencil, but remember that the notes you print out are musical, so they should usually be respected.
 On 6 October 1789, the terrified King Louis XVI, his wife Marie Antoinette, their two children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles), and the King's sister, the Duchess of Polignac, were forced to flee Versailles by a mob of women from Paris.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage, and a crowd surrounded them, shouting and threatening the king and queen.
 The mob forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 In front of the terrified queen, one of the rioters brandished the head of a royal guard who had been killed at the Palace of Versailles.
 The cost of the war of conquest of the Philippines by the U.S. imperialists was paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover most of the expenses, and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the high profits gained from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people are the basic gains of US imperialism.
 To understand the Knights Templar, one must understand the background that led to the formation of the Templar Order.
 The period in which the events took place is usually called the Middle Ages, the period of 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000-1300 AD).
 The Middle Ages are divided into the Early Middle Ages, the High Middle Ages and the Late Middle Ages, with the Late Middle Ages ending around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses many ideas in practice, including technological determinism, technological inevitability, and a strict definition—that human destiny is driven by the back-logic of scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most explanations of technological determinism include these two general ideas: first, the development of technology itself is largely beyond the influence of culture or politics, and second, technology in turn has an inherent “influence” on society that is not subject to social conditions.
 For example, one might say that cars will necessarily promote road development.
 However, only a few cars were built for the national road network, which was not economically viable, so a new production method was developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The high number of cars also leads to a higher rate of road traffic accidents, which will drive the development of new medical technologies to repair injuries.
 Romanticism has a strong cultural determinism color. This comes from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the romantic context, geography shaped the individual, and with time geographically related customs and cultures emerged, which were much more in tune with the place in which society was located than any arbitrary imposed law.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern world, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of the feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as a centre of luxury goods began around 400 AD and lasted until around 1100 AD.
 Its status declined in the 12th century, mainly because the Crusaders brought back goods such as silk and spices that were more valuable than those available in the Byzantine market.
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its peak in the 10th to 11th centuries and 14th century.
 Initially, the robe was deeply influenced by the Eastern Byzantine culture.
 However, due to the slow pace of cultural exchange, Western fashion may be 25 to 30 years behind.
 As the Middle Ages came to a close, the people of Western Europe began to develop their own styles. One of the biggest advances was the use of buttons to fasten clothing, which came about after the Crusades.
 Subsistence farming is the farming of crops for the production of food that is sufficient only for the needs of the farming family, and possibly for the local community.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple and often organic system that uses local seeds stored in the ecosystem, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques, to maximize output.
 Historically, most farmers have been self-sufficient in their agricultural production. This is still the case in many developing countries today.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded individuals who feel that they are being overlooked by the mainstream, and they foster a sense of belonging among their members.
 Given the age, race, class, location and/or gender differences of members, subcultures may be quite diverse.
 The qualities that make a subculture distinctive may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, gender-related, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of subcultural groups often use unique styles of dress, behavior, and slang to symbolically identify themselves as members of the group.
 One of the most common ways to illustrate the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized into adulthood.
 Such children are called "feral children", meaning wild children. Some feral children are kept in confinement by people (usually their own parents); in some cases, the child is abandoned because the parents refuse to accept the child's mental or physical disabilities.
 Before being abandoned or running away from home，wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals; some live in the wild.
 If a wolf child is raised entirely by nonhuman animals, its behavior (to the extent that it is physically possible) will be very similar to that of the animal, for example, it may show fear or indifference to humans.
 While project learning should make learning easier and more fun, the scaffolding approach goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but a means of helping people who are just learning to use a new computer program or start a new project.
 Scaffolding can be done online or offline, in other words, teachers are a form of scaffolding, just like the little helper in Microsoft Office called the Wizard.
 Virtual support is embedded in the software to question, prompt and explain those aspects of the program that may be difficult for students to deal with on their own.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, including neglect, abuse, and even extortion.
 No child should be raised in an environment without discipline, love, and education, but that is exactly what happened.
 We think the foster system is a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable medical care.
 The foster system should provide all the necessities that the child's original family lacked.
 The Internet combines the elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The Internet's distinctive characteristics add an additional dimension to its uses and fulfilment.
 For example, "learning" and "socializing" are considered important motives for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 In their study of audience response to websites, Aime and McDermott (1998) also identified “personal involvement” and “continuing relationship” as new motivational factors.
 The use of video has led to major discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions (facial movements lasting a few milliseconds).
 Specifically, it is said that by correctly reading micro-facial expressions, it is possible to determine whether or not a person is lying.
 In his essay “The President’s Speech,” Oliver Sacks notes that people with brain damage who cannot understand language can still tell when someone is being sincere.
 He even suggested that this ability to understand human behavior may be a common trait among animals, including dogs.
 Twentieth-century research has shown that there are two kinds of gene pools: apparent and hidden.
 Mutations add new genetic variation, while selection removes variation from the pool of expressed genes.
 Due to separation and recombination, variation is shuffled back and forth between the two pools in each generation.
 In the tropics, primates have a digestive system similar to that of humans, and the available plant resources are not sufficient to meet their amino acid requirements.
 Moreover, failure to do so can have serious consequences: growth retardation, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest plant-based resources would be the proteins in leaves and legumes, but primates like us have a hard time digesting them unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easy to digest, but also provide a large amount of protein, which contains all the necessary amino acids.
 In light of the above, if our ancestors solved the “protein problem” in a way similar to that used by the black apes of the tropical grasslands today, we should not be surprised.
 Sleep disruption is defined as a process in which a person is awakened intentionally during normal sleep and falls asleep again within a short time (10-60 minutes).
 This is easy to do by using a relatively quiet alarm clock so that you wake up without being fully awakened.
 If you find yourself resetting your alarm clock while you're asleep, you can put the alarm clock in another room, forcing yourself to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological-based choices include drinking a large amount of liquid before bedtime (especially water or tea, which are known to have diuretic effects) and forcing oneself to get up to urinate.
 The degree of calm in a person's mind is the opposite of the degree of tension in his body and mind.
 The less stress, the more vitality. Everyone has the potential to find absolute peace and satisfaction.
 Everyone can reach the state of enlightenment, and the only thing that prevents us from doing so is our own anxiety and negative emotions.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been expanded through the universal love of Mahayana Buddhism and many techniques from Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It includes methods of kundalini yoga, meditation and universal love.
 In Kundalini yoga, Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The core activity of Tibetan meditation is Tantric Yoga. Through the transformation of different deities, the purification of energy channels, the activation of chakras, and the attainment of enlightenment.
 Germany was the common enemy of all the countries in the war, which facilitated cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. As the war ended, the differences in their systems, procedures, and cultures led to a divergence between the two countries.
 Two years after the war ended, former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 The war lasted 40 years, with the proxy armies fighting on many battlefields from Africa to Asia, including Afghanistan and Cuba.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish front had been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize the army along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans were almost immediately abandoned, and after the invasion of eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Polish-Soviet Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties, more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army soldiers entered the country and established a front in Belarus and Ukraine.
 To date, shipping has been the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 Traditionally, the Navy's task was to ensure that the nation maintained the ability to transport people and goods, while at the same time disrupting the enemy's ability to transport their own people and goods.
 One of the most notable modern examples is the North Atlantic war effort during World War II. The Americans tried to cross the Atlantic to deliver personnel and supplies to help the British.
 Meanwhile, the German Navy, with its U-boats as its main force, tried to intercept the convoy.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would probably have conquered Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Sheep were first domesticated around 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to domesticate them, to eat and use their milk, meat, hair and skin.
 The family sheep are usually herded in groups on the mountain or in other pastures, usually by shepherds (mostly children or adolescents), who are similar to the more widely known shepherds.
 Britain built the first motorway in the 16th century.
 Although the railroad cars were made of parallel wooden planks, for the rough roads of the time, these cars allowed the horses to run faster and carry more.
 Early on, railroad ties were used to secure the rails, but it was soon realized that if iron plates were placed on the rails, the rails would be more stable and effective.
 This became the general practice, but the iron plates would wear out the wooden wheels of the carriages more quickly.
 Eventually, the wooden wheel was replaced by the iron wheel. In 1767, the first all-iron track was built.
 The first known mode of transportation was walking. 2 million years ago, with the appearance of Homo Erectus, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestors, the southern apes, did not have the habit of upright walking.
 The foot specialization was found in fossils of southern apes between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living greener, join the green movement, and even become an environmental activist, to reduce the disaster to some extent.
 In many cases this is similar to symptomatic treatment. But if we want a permanent solution, we should find the root of the problem and eliminate it.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot due to human scientific and technological progress, and the population explosion and human luxurious lifestyle make the problem more serious.
 The handwritten draft, signed by Speaker John Hancock and Secretary of State Charles Thomson, was approved by the Continental Congress on July 4 and sent to the John Dunlap Printing Shop in Philadelphia for printing.
 In one night, 150 to 200 copies were printed, the now-famous "Dunlap broadsides."
 On July 8, John Nixon read the document aloud for the first time in the Independence Hall courtyard.
 One of these letters, dated July 6, was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy of the letter arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 extant Dunlap broadsides are the earliest surviving versions of the document, as the handwritten original has not survived.
 Many paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and evolved into the birds we know today.
 Many people think they are not dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But birds still have many places similar to dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Today, almost all computers in use are based on processing information in binary code.
 Binary numbers can only take on one of two values, either 0 or 1, and are called binary digits, or "bits" in computer terminology.
 Internal poisoning may not immediately manifest itself, and symptoms such as vomiting are common, so a diagnosis cannot be made immediately.
 The most powerful indication of ingestion of a poison may be an open container at the scene containing a drug or household toxic chemical.
 Check the label on the poison for specific first aid instructions.
 Entomologists use the term "bug" to refer to this class of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity of people with the botfly, a parasitic insect that is very well adapted to infest humans.
 Both the parasitoid wasp and the parasitic fly are nest parasites, adapted to live in the nests or homes of their hosts.
 There are approximately 400,000 cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) in the United States, making it the leading neurological disease of young adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system (composed of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerves).
 Research has found that women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis (MS).
 A couple may decide not to have children for their own benefit, or for the benefit of their children.
 These couples may have a plan to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents terminate their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to find out how the world works, and in fact, this method can provide guidance for most scientific research.
 An experiment is a test to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses, but it is not the only method. Asking questions and observing can also guide scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers were interested in the classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on all areas of science, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the decline of Greek knowledge, the West was cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many of the physiological and behavioral rhythms observed by researchers are largely dependent on endogenous cycles and their presence.
 Periodic rhythms are not just a simple response to external periodic signals. Rhythms are found in most organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 A biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that keeps time in a relatively free manner, even in the absence of external cues.
 The experiments of Hershey and Chase were one of the first indications that DNA was the primary carrier of hereditary information.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages or viruses to insert their own DNA into bacteria.
 They did two experiments, one to label the bacteria's DNA with radioactive phosphorus, and the other to label the bacteria's proteins with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a variety of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected genetic material, and whether the affected cell is a reproductive cell.
 Only the mutations in reproductive cells are passed on to the child, while the mutations in other cells cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts those interested in natural areas, who come to see natural scenery, including wildlife.
 On-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, park tours and ecosystem studies.
 For example, visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people drive out of the small town to go to work, and the places where they work are where they left from.
 In this dynamic traffic commute, everyone is connected to and supports the car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, science has shown that this massive carbon economy can no longer sustain the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the past 2 million years.
 Everyone is a part of society, and everyone uses the transportation system. And almost everyone has a complaint about the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges to the same degree.
 Why do transportation systems cause so much complaint? Why do they break down every day? Are transportation engineers incompetent? Or is there a more fundamental reason?
 Traffic flow studies are concerned with the movement of drivers and vehicles between two points, and their interactions with each other.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flows because it is not possible to predict the behavior of drivers with 100 percent certainty.
 Fortunately, the driver's behavior is usually within a reasonable consistency range; therefore, the traffic flow usually has a certain reasonable consistency, which can be roughly expressed by mathematical methods.
 In order to better express traffic flow, a relationship was established between the following three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly in the air. The ability to fly made them easier to escape from enemies and to find food and mates.
 Most insects have an advantage in that they can fold their wings back along their bodies.
 This gives them more small spaces to hide from predators.
 The only insects that cannot fold their wings back are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people think he was right, but many others disagree; they think the solar system revolves around the Earth, and the Sun (and other stars) do too.
 This seems reasonable, because the Earth doesn't feel itself moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the second longest river in the world, and it is more than eight times the size of the next largest river.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river in the world, with some sections as wide as 6 miles.
 The Amazon River accounts for 20% of all riverine discharge to the oceans.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,960 mi) long. The river's water comes from thousands of smaller tributaries.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the great size and sophisticated construction techniques of the Giza pyramids have never been surpassed.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed by the monuments of their predecessors, which were more than a thousand years old.
 The population of Vatican City is about 800 people. It is the smallest independent state in the world, and also the least populated country.
 The city of Vatican uses Italian in its laws, statutes and official communications.
 Italian is also the language most people in the country use on a daily basis, while Latin is used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, copper, and so on since ancient times, because these elements can be found in nature in their natural state and are relatively easy to extract using primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle proposed a theory that any object is made up of one or more of the four elements of earth, water, air, and fire.
 This is more like the four states of matter (in no particular order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also proposed a theory that they can change into new matter, making up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically made of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Calcium, potassium, and so on are metals, and silver and gold are metals, of course.
 There are also alloys containing small amounts of non-metallic elements (such as carbon).
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that the period at the end of this sentence could contain millions of billions of atoms.
 So when the pencil was invented, it became a favorite of many.
 Unfortunately, with the advent of new writing methods, the pencil's position has been lowered and its use has been reduced.
 People now write on computer screens, and never have to touch a pen.
 One can only guess what the future holds for the keyboard when the updated product appears.
 The fission bomb works as follows: It takes energy to bring together an atomic nucleus and many protons and neutrons.
 It's a bit like pushing a heavy little cart up a hill, splitting the atom again, and then releasing some energy.
 Some atoms contain unstable nuclei, which means that they are likely to split under little or no stimulation.
 The surface of the Moon is made up of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 kilometers thick near the surface and about 100 kilometers thick at the far end.
 The darker side is thinner, and the higher side is thicker.
 Because the crust is thinner, the nearby side may have more dark areas, and lava is more likely to rise to the surface.
 The core of the content theory is to find factors that are recognized or arouse interest.
 These theories suggest that as people mature to a certain degree into adulthood, certain needs and/or desires are internalized.
 These theories study why some people want to do what they do, and what in their environment makes them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, when managers start leading former colleagues, they tend to behave in one of two ways. One is to try to maintain a “close relationship” with team members.
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions, and has difficulty enforcing discipline, evaluating performance, assigning responsibility, and holding people accountable.
 In another extreme, this person becomes a different individual, who feels that he/she must change everything the team is doing and take credit for the results.
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success or failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between the leader and the other members of the team.
 Virtual teams need to maintain the same quality standards as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often act as the point of contact for their corresponding offline team.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, because their teams may schedule meetings at different times for different time zones, which may be misunderstood by local management.
 The very existence of a “hidden team” (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 An “invisible team” is a management team to which each member reports. It sets standards for all members.
 Why would an organization spend so much time building a learning organization? One of the goals of putting the concept of organizational learning into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are used effectively among the functional departments of an organization, creativity and innovation will occur.
 Therefore, an organization in the process of overcoming obstacles together often leads to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, share knowledge, and engage in organized learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous improvement approach as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for the theoretical methods of cognitive research. Therefore, it narrows the scope of research and makes it more accurate.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior can support researchers in their studies.
 We have known for a long time that different types of brain injury, trauma, disease and tumors can affect behavior and cause changes in certain mental abilities.
 New technologies have allowed us to see and study the structure and workings of the brain in ways that were never possible before.
 This provides us with a wealth of information and material to build a simulation model, which helps us understand the process of brain functioning.
 Artificial intelligence has a strong science fiction flavor, but it is actually a very important branch of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning and intelligence of machines.
 Artificial intelligence (AI) research involves building machines that can perform tasks that require intelligence.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and customer issues, and handwriting recognition, voice and facial features.
 All of these became independent disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to problems in real life.
 Artificial intelligence systems are now common in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, and some home computers and video game software applications have built-in artificial intelligence systems.
 Field trips are an important part of any teaching activity. Often, teachers are happy to take students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 Virtual field trips are high-tech solutions. Students can view museum artifacts in the classroom, visit an aquarium, or admire fine art.
 Sharing the field trip virtually is also a good way to review the trip and share experiences with the next class.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website each year about their state capitals trip. The website is redesigned each year, but the old versions are kept online as scrapbooks.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills. Although students often begin blogging with sloppy grammar and spelling, the presence of readers usually changes that.
 Students are often the most critical readers, so bloggers begin to work hard to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also “forces students to be more observant of the world around them.” By satisfying the audience’s interest, students are motivated to become smarter and more interesting.
 Blogging is a tool that can foster collaboration and encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "Blogging can help students become better analysts and thinkers; by actively responding to online materials, students can find their own place in the context of others' writings and can develop their own opinions on specific issues (Oravec, 2002)."
 Ottawa is the capital of Canada, a charming city with a bilingual system, and is highlighted by a series of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and present.
 To the south is Niagara Falls, to the north is the Muskoka River and the unspoiled natural beauty of the river's opposite shore.
 All these things make Ontario the typical Canada that foreigners think of.
 Further north, the land is sparsely populated, and some areas are uninhabited wilderness.
 One striking population comparison: the number of African Americans living in the United States is greater than the number of Canadian citizens.
 The East African islands are located in the Indian Ocean off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is the largest island in the world, and is still a continent for wildlife.
 The smaller islands are mostly independent or French territories, and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the land, and the religion is prevalent in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 Europe's influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorers such as Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape of Good Hope route to India.
 It is bordered by the Sahel region to the north, the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west, and the Gulf of Guinea to the south.
 Female: It is recommended that all female visitors, regardless of marital status, state that they are married.
 Wearing a ring can help, too (but don't wear a ring that looks too expensive.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to what they perceive as harassment; and that being followed, having your arm grabbed, etc. is not uncommon.
 When you say no to a man, be firm and don’t be afraid to stand up for yourself (regardless of cultural differences, stand your ground!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed the city and rebuilt it, naming it Casa Branca, until an earthquake in 1755 left it in ruins.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya. Spanish merchants established a trading post here and named it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring shopping destinations in all of Morocco.
 In the old city of Medina, shops selling traditional Moroccan goods such as tagines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and various trinkets are everywhere, but these are aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, located on the eastern edge of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano. The lava buried much of the town's streets, especially in the town centre.
 While Goma is relatively safe, travel to any location outside of Goma should be researched in advance to determine whether fighting in North Kivu has subsided.
 The city is also the base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo and the cheapest gorilla tracking in Africa.
 You can explore Goma by boda-boda (motorcycle taxi). The normal (local) price for a short trip is 500 Congolese francs.
 Because it is relatively remote, "Tibetan Plateau" is used to refer to a distant foreign country.
 Today, although the fame of Tin Bukto has made it a tourist destination, and there is an airport, it is a poor town.
 In 1990, it was listed as a World Heritage in Danger due to the threat of the desert.
 This was a key stop on Henry Louis Gates's PBS special, "African American Lives."
 The city is in stark contrast to the rest of the country, as it is more Arabic than African in style.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the east and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park covers 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecological zones, supporting a wide variety of wildlife.
 It is one of the main attractions in South Africa and is considered to be the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks) system.
 Like all South African national parks, the park charges a conservation fee and an entrance fee every day.
 A Wild Card is also useful. It allows you to enter some of South Africa's parks or all of the national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the name of the Hong Kong region, and is also the focus of many tourists.
 The many buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline are like a flashing bar chart, especially when reflected in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 If you want to see the best views of Hong Kong, you can leave the island and head to the beach on the other side.
 Most of Hong Kong Island's urban development is concentrated on the reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is where the British colonists occupied the land, so if you want to find evidence of the colonial history of this territory, this is a good starting point.
 The Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove forest, stretching 80 kilometres (50 mi) from the coast into Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans has been declared a World Heritage Site by UNESCO. The Indian part of this forest is called Sundarbans National Park.
 But these forests are not just mangrove swamps; there are also the remains of some huge forests that once covered the Ganges plain.
 Sunderland covers an area of 3850 square kilometres, of which about one third is water/marshland.
 Since 1966, Sungei Buloh has been a wildlife sanctuary, and is home to an estimated 400 Royal Bengal tigers and about 30,000 deer.
 Buses run all day from the Intercity Bus Station (across the river), but most of the buses, especially those to the east and Jalalabad/Bumthang, run between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Given the frequent fullness of the Inter-City buses, it is recommended to purchase tickets several days in advance.
 Most areas can be reached by comfortable and sturdy Japanese Coaster minibuses.
 To get to nearby places like Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200), a shared taxi is a quick and comfortable way to go.
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, Brazil, with Saint-Georges, French Guiana.
 The two bridge towers are 83 meters high, the bridge is 378 meters long, and there are two 3.50 meter wide lanes.
 The bridge has a vertical net clearance of 15 meters. The project was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs inspection station is also expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group in the present-day region of eastern Paraguay, living a semi-nomadic hunter-gatherer lifestyle, with some agricultural activities.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous tribes, such as the Guaycuru and Payagua, who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay was known as the “Province of the Indians” in the 16th century, a product of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous population.
 The Spanish began a three-century-long period of colonization.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has sought to preserve many of the city's native characteristics and features.
 Argentina is famous for its top-class polo teams and players.
 The biggest tournament of the year is held in December at the polo field in Las Cañitas.
 On other days of the year, smaller competitions and races are also held here.
 For news of the tournament and how to buy tickets for the polo matches, please see the Argentine Polo Association website.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Island Pound, which is equal in value to the British Pound.
 Currency can be exchanged at the island's only bank, located in Stanley, across from the FIC West store.
 The pound is generally accepted everywhere on the island, and credit cards and US dollars are often accepted in Stanley.
 Credit cards may not be accepted in the Outer Islands, but US and UK currency is accepted; please contact the owner in advance to confirm the accepted method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to change Falkland Islands currency outside the islands, so you should change it before leaving.
 Montevideo is located south of the equator, so during the northern hemisphere's winter, it is summer in Montevideo.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical region; in summer months, temperatures often exceed 30 °C (86 °F).
 Winter can feel colder than it actually is: temperatures rarely fall below freezing, but when wind and humidity combine, it can feel colder than the thermometer says.
 There is no specific “rainy season” and “dry season” here: the annual rainfall is more or less the same.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to humans, they are still wild animals, and we should not feed or disturb them.
 Park officials say that you should keep at least 100 yards from bears and wolves, and 25 yards from all other wildlife!
 No matter how gentle they may appear, bison, moose, elk, bears, and nearly all large animals can attack humans.
 Dozens of visitors are injured each year by failing to keep a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so please give them space.
 In addition, bears and other wildlife are attracted by odors, so avoid bringing or cooking odorous foods and keep campsites clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is located on the island of Upolu, with a population of less than 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The bay was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the bay.
 Apart from a British cruiser, all the other ships sank. Nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the course of a peaceful meeting organized by the Mua movement to demand independence, the chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, was killed.
 Auckland straddles two harbours, so there are many beaches in the city. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The north shore beaches (located within the North Shore City) run along the Pacific Ocean from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It's almost all beach, and swimming is safe, with most of the beaches sheltered by New Zealand's Christmas trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located on the Waitemata Harbour, in the upmarket suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, in the central part of Auckland.
 These beaches are sometimes crowded with families on holiday, and there are a variety of shops along the waterfront. Swimming is safe.
 The main beer is "Number One" beer, which is not complex but very drinkable and refreshing. Another local beer is called "Manta".
 You can buy a lot of French wines here, but New Zealand and Australian wines may be more travel-friendly.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still worried, bottled water is readily available.
 The concept of flat white coffee is still relatively new to Australians. A small cup of black coffee is a "flat white", cappuccino is a "cappuccino", and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. The juice is expensive, but the quality is good.
 There are many people who visit the Great Barrier Reef all year round, and there are very few incidents of people being injured while participating in any of the above activities.
 Nevertheless, it is necessary to follow the advice of the relevant authorities, comply with all the signs and pay close attention to safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish can be found on the beaches and estuaries of 1770 town from October to April each year, and occasionally at other times.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The crocodile's main habitat is not the ocean, but the mouth of the North Rockhampton River.
 Booking in advance can give travelers peace of mind that they will have a place to stay when they arrive.
 Although travel agencies may be able to book you a camping trip or other form of accommodation, they usually work with specific hotels.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport transfers, and even airline and hotel accommodation.
 If you need time to consider whether the price is right, or you need to obtain other documentation to reach your destination (such as a visa), they can hold your reservation for you.
 If any changes are required or any requests are made, they should be made through the travel agent, not directly with the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the majority of attendees choose to camp on site, and most attendees consider this to be an important part of the festival experience.
 If you want to get a good view of the show, you'll have to get there early and set up camp near the stage.
 Remember, although the main stage music may have ended, the rest of the festival may still be playing music until late into the night.
 Some music festivals have special camping areas for families with children.
 If you cross the North Sea in winter, you have to check the position of the cabin, because sailing on the ice will bring very unpleasant noise to those who are most affected.
 St. Petersburg cruises include an in-city tour. Cruise passengers are granted visa-free entry (please see the Terms and Conditions for details).
 Casinos generally try to make customers spend as much time and money as possible. Casinos usually have no windows or clocks, and exits are often hard to find.
 They usually provide special food, drinks and entertainment activities to keep the customers happy and stay at the casino.
 Some venues provide free alcoholic beverages. However, alcohol impairs judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone driving in high altitude areas or crossing mountain passes should consider the possibility of snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On ice, the friction is very low, so you can't drive like you would on a smooth asphalt road.
 In a blizzard, a very short time of snowfall can be enough to trap you.
 Snow, sleet, water droplets on the windshield, or ice can also block your vision.
 On the other hand, ice and snow weather is very common in many countries, and traffic is almost never interrupted throughout the year.
 Hunting is probably the most attractive tourist activity in Africa and is a highlight for many visitors.
 The word “safari” in common usage refers to a land-based trip to view the spectacular wildlife of Africa, especially in the tropical grasslands.
 Some animals (such as elephants and moose) often like to get close to cars, and standard equipment can make it easier to appreciate them.
 Lions, leopards and cheetahs are sometimes afraid of people, and you can see them more clearly with binoculars.
 Hiking (also called bushwalking, backpacking, or trekking) is generally walking, usually for several hours or days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held elsewhere in Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to host two Summer Olympics, the first being in 1964.
 If you booked a flight and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may face a tricky situation.
 Cancellations vary, but as of the end of March, most of the cancellations due to the new coronavirus did not extend beyond July 2020, when the Olympics were originally scheduled to take place.
 Ticket prices are expected to range from 2,500 yen to 130,000 yen, with the average price around 7,000 yen.
 Wringing wet clothes can help them dry. Even if you don't have an iron and ironing board, many hotels offer a laundry service.
 If you don't have an iron, or you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer (if you have one).
 Be careful not to make your clothes too hot (this can cause them to shrink, and in extreme cases, can even burn them).
 There are many ways to purify water, some of which are more effective for specific contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute is enough, in others, it takes a few minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies, and if you are concerned about this, you should consider buying bottled water from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter hazardous animals that are not common in their home country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation, and in more serious cases, cause an allergic reaction, spread toxins, or spread disease.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or those dangerous animals that can kill humans through violence, are not usually pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to purchase duty-free goods in a specific location.
 Travellers to countries/regions with high taxes on alcoholic beverages and tobacco can sometimes save a lot of money by purchasing these products in these places.
 The most challenging section of the Pennsylvania Turnpike is the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont, which passes through remote and isolated areas.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, you will need to keep your wits about you: there are steep hills, narrow roads and sharp bends everywhere.
 The posted speed limit is significantly lower than on the surrounding roads, and strict enforcement of the speed limit is more important than on other roads.
 Oddly enough, though, the cell service here is much better than on many other routes I've taken (like the Pennsylvania back roads).
 Germany has some great pastries, but Bavaria takes it to the next level with a wide variety of delicacies that are similar to their neighbors to the south, Austria.
 Fruit snacks are common, and apples are available year-round, as are cherries and apricots in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also feature almonds, apricots and other nuts. Popular cakes are often paired with strong coffee.
 If you want a little something sweet, try a fruit jam filled pastry, which is known by different names in different regions, such as Berliner, Pfannkuchen, and Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish made with spices and herbs, and is usually served with meat or vegetables.
 Curry dishes can be either "dry" or "wet", depending on how much water is used.
 In the north of India and in the interior of Pakistan, curd is often used in curries; in the south of India and in other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is often used.
 Indonesia has 17,000 islands, so Indonesian cuisine is a catch-all term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines.
 But without further ado, this word usually refers to food that originates from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now, you can find Javanese food all over the islands, and many of the dishes are simple to make, while the Javanese love to use peanuts, chilies, sugar (especially Javanese palm sugar), and various spices.
 The stirrups are suspended from the saddle on either side and are used to support the rider's feet.
 They provide better stability for the rider, but also have safety hazards, because the rider's feet can get stuck.
 If the rider is thrown from the horse but one foot is caught in the stirrup, the horse may drag him along as it runs. To minimize this risk, some precautions can be taken.
 First, most horseback riders wear spurs, and the soles of their shoes are smooth and narrow.
 Secondly, some saddles – especially English saddles – have safety girths, which, if the rider falls off backwards, the girth will come off the saddle.
 Chile’s premier mountaineering destination, the Cochamó Valley, is known as South America’s Yosemite, with its array of granite cliffs and crags.
 From the mountain peaks there is a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world are constantly opening new routes on the steep cliffs that serve as climbing walls.
 Skiing on a mountain is a very popular sport, and includes both downhill skiing and snowboarding, where a snowboard or ski board is strapped to your feet and you slide down the snow-covered terrain.
 Skiing is the main tourist activity for many ski enthusiasts, who are sometimes referred to as "ski bums", who plan to ski at a particular location for the entire holiday.
 The idea of skiing has been around for a long time – cave paintings of skiers date back to 5,000 BC!
 As a sport, downhill skiing can be traced back to at least the 17th century, when Norwegians established the first recreational ski club in Australia in 1861.
 Ski Freeride: This activity is also called backcountry skiing, ski touring or ski mountaineering.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually does not involve these two activities. These two activities are done on steep terrain and require harder skis and boots.
 Imagine the skiing route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you can go further than walking—but only in a few cases will you be able to achieve the same speed as cross-country skiing on a flat track without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small landmasses, but with many independent countries, and traveling across multiple countries usually means multiple visa applications and passport checks.
 However, in this respect, the Schengen area is like a country.
 As long as you are staying in this area, you can usually cross the border directly without going through the passport checkpoint again.
 Likewise, with a Schengen visa, you do not have to apply for a visa to each Schengen member state separately, thus saving time, money and hassle.
 There is no uniform definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax agencies define an antique as anything over 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical variations, with the age limit in North America being shorter than in Europe.
 Handicrafts may be defined as antiques, although they are much younger than mass-produced counterparts.
 Reindeer herding is an important livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture surrounding the industry is important to many who make their living in other ways.
 Even if we start from the traditional point of view, not all the Sami were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, and they lived on fishing, hunting and similar activities, and usually kept reindeer as draft animals.
 Nowadays many Sámi are involved in modern industries. Tourism is a major source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi homeland.
 Although the term "gypsy" is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about Roma.
 If you are visiting a country that is subject to a travel warning, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of governments other than your own, but their advice is for their citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different treatment than Europeans or Arabs.
 Travel advisories can only provide a brief summary of the situation.
 The advice given here is often more general, vague and simplistic than the more detailed information provided elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon; it can cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere in the world. Severe weather comes in many different types, depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, hailstorms, excessive rainfall, wildfires, and thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts, and cyclones are all manifestations and effects of extreme weather.
 Regional and seasonal severe weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of the severe weather risks in their destination, as they may affect travel plans.
 Anyone planning to go to a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 Search the Internet for “counter-insurgency training” and you may find the address of a local company that offers training.
 The course usually covers all the topics discussed here, and is often very hands-on.
 The training usually lasts 2-5 days and involves role-playing, first aid training, and sometimes armed training.
 Books and magazines on wilderness survival are common, but those on combat survival are rare.
 Travelers who plan to undergo gender reassignment surgery abroad must carry valid documents when returning home.
 As for whether they want to issue passports without a gender marker (X) or want to change documents to match their desired name and gender, governments’ attitudes vary.
 The degree of foreign government recognition of these documents also varies widely.
 In the post-September 11 era, security checkpoints have become even more cumbersome.
 Transgender people who have not yet undergone surgery have to reveal their privacy when they go through the scanner, and cannot guarantee their dignity.
 An eddy is a backward flow of water from the shore into the sea, usually occurring at a reef or similar feature.
 The underwater topography causes the currents to concentrate in a few deep areas, where they can form strong currents flowing toward the deep.
 Most deaths are caused by swimming upstream, exhaustion, or drowning.
 Once out of the rapids, it was not so difficult to get back.
 Try to swim to a place where you won't get stuck again, or wait for rescue (depending on your skill and whether you've been spotted).
 The impact of returning home is faster than the cultural impact (the honeymoon period is shorter), lasts longer, and can be more severe.
 For travelers who are easily adaptable to new cultures, it can be difficult to re-adapt to their own culture.
 After living abroad for a while, you will find that you have adapted to the new culture and have dropped some of your home culture's habits.
 When you first arrive, people may be very patient and understanding, because they know that travelers need time to adjust to a new country.
 One might not think that travelers need patience and understanding on the way back.
 For children, the sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting activities in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and before the show begins you can see them silently standing there.
 You can hear the voices of tourists and street vendors in the background, as if you were listening to a story.
 The backdrop is a lion-faced man, who is also the narrator of the long story.
 The scene is displayed on the pyramid, with different pyramids being lit up.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819. Several countries claim sovereignty over the islands, and the islands have the most bases, with sixteen bases in use in 2020.
 The islands are located 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception Island. There, a still active volcano has been submerged by flood waters, providing a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is located in the southern part of the peninsula, facing the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula were incorporated into the highlands, and then re-formed into the 360-kilometer-long Ellsworth Mountains, which were split in half by the Minnesota glacier.
 In the north, or rather the Southern Alps, the highest mountain range in Antarctica, the Monts Vincennes, is located, with the highest peak being Mount Vincennes at 4,892 m.
 In remote areas where cell phone coverage is poor, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones generally cannot replace mobile phones because they can only be used outdoors where the satellite signal is strong.
 The service is often used for shipping, including yachts, and for expeditions that require remote data and voice communications.
 Your local phone service provider should be able to provide you with detailed information about connecting to this service.
 For those who plan to spend a gap year, study abroad is becoming an increasingly popular option.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, who can take a year off before going to college without affecting their education.
 In many cases, taking a gap year abroad can actually improve your chances of getting into a good college back home.
 Typically, participation in these educational programs requires a fee.
 Finland is a great sailing destination, and is known as the "thousand lakes" country, with thousands of islands in its lakes and archipelago.
 In the archipelago and lakes, boats are not necessary.
 The coastal islands and the largest lakes are large enough to accommodate any yacht, but smaller boats and even canoes can provide a different experience.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand also have similar situations, but in other ways they are unique (for example, in the Netherlands, this figure is one to forty).
 Most typical Baltic cruises will spend a long time in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can have a full day to explore this historic city, then sleep on the boat at night.
 If you are only visiting on a ship, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Some cruise lines advertise Berlin as a highlight, but as can be seen from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea and the cruise price does not include the cost of visiting the city.
 Flying can be a terrifying experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they have never flown before or have had a bad experience.
 This is not a trivial matter: it is the same as the fear and disgust that many people feel about other things.
 For some people, understanding how aircraft work and how they fly can help to overcome fears caused by the unknown or uncontrollable.
 Courier companies can earn high rewards for fast delivery of goods. Time is often of the essence for business documents, goods or parts used for emergency repairs.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but for other routes and small companies, it is a problem.
 If they use air transport, it can take several days to unload and clear goods on some routes.
 The quickest way is to have it shipped as baggage. According to the airline, it is forbidden to carry unaccompanied baggage, and you will need to be present at the airport.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay a lot of money to enjoy the privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for it).
 However, this is not cheap: according to rough estimates, the price of a business class ticket may be 4 times that of an economy class ticket, and the price of a first class ticket is even 11 times that of an economy class ticket!
 Generally, flying from A to B without a stopover, you don't need to look for discounted business class or first class tickets.
 Airlines know that some core customers are willing to pay a premium for speed and comfort, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic, which has suffered from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the establishment of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Moldovan Republic in the eastern part of the country, with its own government and currency, but without the recognition of any United Nations member state.
 Although the political negotiations failed, the economic ties between the two regions of Moldova were reestablished.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, with a population of about 3.7 million, and is Turkey's second largest port, after Istanbul, and a busy transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, it is now a modern, developed and busy commercial centre, surrounded by a huge bay and mountains.
 Between the wide avenues, glass-walled buildings and modern shopping malls, there are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets and ancient mosques and churches, but the city has a more Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 In Haldarsvík you can enjoy the view of the nearby island of Eysturoy. The village has a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, some of the tombs are topped with interesting marble carvings of doves.
 A half-hour stroll through this charming village is well worth it.
 To the north is the romantic and charming town of Sintra, the idyllic place made famous by Lord Byron and known to foreigners.
 Scotturb 403 buses run regularly to Sintra, stopping at the Rocha Cape.
 You can also visit the Basilica of Our Lady of Fatima in the north, which is the place where the Virgin Mary appeared.
 Remember, you are visiting a huge mass grave site that has a significance to a large group of people in the world.
 There are still many men and women who survived here, who are still alive today; and many more whose relatives were murdered there, who worked as slave labourers until they died, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please give this place the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not joke about the Holocaust or the Nazis.
 Do not mark or graffiti on the buildings to avoid damaging the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the locals prefer to speak Catalan, and the vast majority understand Catalan, while Spanish is understood by almost everyone.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as this is the first official language, as stipulated by law.
 However, Spanish is also widely used in public transportation and other facilities.
 The regular announcements in the metro are only in Catalan, but the automatic system makes temporary announcements in several languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are notorious for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to live in Paris is to behave as well as possible and present yourself as a “bien élevé” (well-bred) person, which will make socializing much easier.
 If you show a little basic courtesy, the Parisian rudeness will quickly disappear.
 The forests of Plitvice Lakes National Park are dense, mainly composed of beech, fir and spruce, and are characterized by a mixture of mountain and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Because of the variety of microclimates, soils and altitudes, the flora is very diverse and is famous for this.
 The area is also home to a variety of animals and birds.
 There you can see rare animals such as European brown bear, wolves, eagles, hawks, lynx, wild cats and turkeys, as well as many more common species.
 Women must wear skirts when visiting the monastery, and the skirts must be knee-length, and the shoulders must be covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a wrap for women who are not prepared, but if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monks at the door will give you a wink.
 Likewise, men must wear long pants and cover their knees.
 You can also borrow from the coat rack at the entrance, but the clothes aren't washed after each use, so they may be a bit uncomfortable to wear. All of them are one size fits all!
 The cuisine of the island of Malta is similar to that of the other Mediterranean islands, based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil exclusively.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple summer meal: a slice of bread with olive oil, tomato, and any toppings you have on hand, like cheese, tuna, or even ham.
 All nouns except those that indicate you (Sie) should begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between certain verbs and their objects.
 This also makes reading easier, although it makes writing more complicated, because you need to judge whether a verb or adjective is being used as a noun-like form.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are spelled exactly as they are pronounced.
 The main letters to be aware of are c and g, because their pronunciation changes depending on the vowel that follows.
 Also, make sure to pronounce r and rr differently: “caro” means “dear” while “carro” means “cart”.
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and regular.
 So reading this grammar book will help you to learn more Persian grammar and understand more Persian phrases.
 Needless to say, if you speak a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, anyone who knows a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is very similar to Spanish and that it is not necessary to learn it separately.
 Nowadays, most of the pre-modern observatories have been dismantled, and only a few are preserved as museums or educational facilities.
 Since light pollution was not as bad as it is now, observatories were often built in urban areas or on college campuses, making them easier to reach than modern observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities located in remote areas with good atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami, or the viewing of cherry blossoms, has been a Japanese custom since the 8th century.
 The concept originated in China, and the peony is a favorite flower of the Chinese.
 In Japan, the earliest cherry blossom parties were held by the emperor for himself and other members of the royal family at the imperial palace.
 Plants are at their best in their natural environment. So resist the temptation to pick them, even if it is “just one.”
 If you are visiting a carefully landscaped garden, collecting “specimens” can also get you evicted, with no room for negotiation.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, navigation is easy and you can buy almost anything once you arrive.
 But because you are in the “high tropics” a few degrees north of the equator, you will need to deal with both high temperatures (year-round) and strong sunlight (when the weather is clear, which is relatively rare).
 Several buses also headed north to Hebron, where the traditional burial sites of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives are located.
 Please make sure that the bus you intend to take will enter Hebron, and not just the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme for a holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, or taking a river cruise to explore the charming cities along the Danube.
 They also mapped out routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important Christian holidays, and is celebrated to commemorate the birth of Jesus Christ.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday are also embraced by non-Christians in non-Christian countries.
 A tradition is to stay up on Easter night to watch the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has its Christian theological explanation, but it is very likely that it was a ritual of celebrating the spring, praying for the harvest, which existed before the birth of Christ.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter Vigil services on Saturday nights during Holy Week, with the congregation usually arriving at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 Initially, animals reached the islands by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Because the islands are so far from the mainland, mammals cannot travel there, so the giant turtles are the main grazers on the islands.
 When humans arrived on the Galapagos Islands, they introduced many mammals, including sheep, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience polar night, a period of time when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This provides an excellent opportunity to see the Northern Lights, as the sky will be dark for a whole day.
 These areas are sparsely populated and generally free of light pollution, so you can enjoy a starry sky.
 Compared to the work culture of Westerners, the Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and more formal.
 Business attire is standard, and colleagues refer to each other by their surnames or job titles.
 A harmonious workplace atmosphere is crucial, emphasizing team effort rather than individual achievement.
 Employees must obtain approval from their superiors before making any decisions, and must unconditionally obey their instructions.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.29180134010700987, 'precisions': [0.6212244565659855, 0.3554810223316634, 0.2264661520716884, 0.1486762656758012], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9937103298068899, 'length_ratio': 0.9937300271024635, 'translation_length': 24566, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.44784709107476, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}